Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 11.8
ESCORT SERVICES

Editor's note:

This article 11.8 was added with relocations in 2017. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

29-11.8-101. Short title.

The short title of this article 11.8 is the "Colorado Escort Service Code".

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1031, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-25.5-101 as it existed prior to 2017.

29-11.8-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that this article 11.8 shall be deemed an exercise of the police powers of the state for the protection of the economic and social welfare and the health, welfare, and safety of the people of this state.

The general assembly further declares that the licensing and regulation of escort bureaus are matters of statewide concern; therefore, this article 11.8 shall be applicable in every city, town, county, and city and county in this state.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1031, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-25.5-102 as it existed prior to 2017.

29-11.8-103. Definitions.

As used in this article 11.8, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Escort" means any person who, for a salary, fee, commission, hire, or profit, makes himself or herself available to the public for the purpose of accompanying other persons for companionship.

"Escort bureau" means any business, agency, or person who, for a fee, commission, hire, or profit, furnishes or arranges for persons to accompany other persons for companionship.

"Escort bureau runner" means any person who, for a salary, fee, hire, or profit, acts in the capacity of an agent for an escort bureau by contacting or meeting with escort patrons whether or not the person is employed by such escort bureau or by another business or is self-employed.

"Escort patron" means any person who seeks the services of an escort, escort bureau, or escort bureau runner.

"Licensed premises" means that single, discrete, identifiable location at which a licensed activity is permitted and, in fact, is conducted under the authority of any one license.

"Local licensing authority" means the governing body of a municipality or city and county, the board of county commissioners of a county, or any authority designated by municipal or county charter, municipal resolution or ordinance, or county resolution or ordinance.

"Person" means a natural person, partnership, association, company, corporation, or organization or a managing agent, servant, officer, partner, owner, operator, or employee of any of them.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1031, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-25.5-103 as it existed prior to 2017.

29-11.8-104. License required.

No person shall hold himself or herself out to the public as an escort, or accept compensation as an escort, without having first secured a license therefor from the local licensing authority.

No person shall conduct, manage, or carry on an escort bureau without having first secured a license therefor from the local licensing authority.

No person shall represent himself or herself as an escort bureau runner, or accept compensation as an escort bureau runner, without having first secured a license therefor from the local licensing authority.

Licenses issued under this article 11.8 shall be valid only within the boundaries of the local licensing authority.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1032, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-25.5-104 as it existed prior to 2017.

29-11.8-105. Licensing - general provisions.

All licenses granted pursuant to the provisions of this article 11.8 shall be valid for a period of one year from the date of their issuance unless revoked or suspended pursuant to section 29-11.8-108 or 29-11.8-113.

Application for the renewal of an existing license shall be made to the local licensing authority not less than forty-five days prior to the date of expiration. The local licensing authority may cause a hearing on the application for renewal to be held. No such renewal hearing shall be held by the local licensing authority until a notice of hearing has been conspicuously posted on the licensed premises for a period of ten days and notice of the hearing has been provided the applicant at least ten days prior to the hearing. The local licensing authority may refuse to renew any license for good cause, subject to judicial review.

Each license issued under this article 11.8 is separate and distinct, and no person shall exercise any of the privileges granted under any license other than that which the person holds. A separate license must be obtained by each person wishing to exercise any of the privileges governed by this article 11.8 and for each geographical location at or from which any person wishes to conduct business as an escort, escort bureau, or escort bureau runner.

No license granted under the provisions of this article 11.8 may be transferred or assigned, with or without consideration, without the consent of the local licensing authority. Any attempted transfer or assignment without the consent of the local licensing authority shall render the applicable license void.

No changes of location for licensed premises shall be allowed without the consent of the local licensing authority. Any attempted change of location for licensed premises without the consent of the local licensing authority shall render the applicable license void.

When a license has been issued to a husband and wife, the death of a spouse shall not require the surviving spouse to obtain a new license. All rights and privileges granted under the original license shall continue in full force and effect as to the survivor for the balance of the license.

The licenses provided pursuant to this article 11.8 shall specify the date of issuance, the period which is covered, the name of the licensee, and the premises licensed. The license shall be conspicuously displayed at all times in the licensed premises of any person thereby licensed.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1032, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-25.5-105 as it existed prior to 2017.

29-11.8-106. Application to local licensing authority - minimum qualifications - issuance - definition.

Application for a license under the provisions of this article 11.8 shall be made to the local licensing authority on forms prepared and furnished by the local licensing authority, which shall set forth such information as the local licensing authority may require to enable the authority to determine whether a license should be granted. The information shall include the name and address of the applicant and, if a partnership, also the names and addresses of all the partners and, if a corporation, association, or other organization, also the names and addresses of the president, vice-president, secretary, and managing officer, together with all other information deemed necessary by the local licensing authority. Each application shall be verified by the oath or affirmation of such persons as the local licensing authority may prescribe. The local licensing authority may require payment of a reasonable processing fee with each application, which fee shall not exceed three hundred dollars for an escort bureau license application and two hundred dollars for an escort license application.

No individual shall be issued a license as an escort or as an escort bureau runner unless he or she:

Has attained eighteen years of age;

Is a resident of the state of Colorado.

No person shall be issued a license as an escort bureau, and no person other than an individual shall be issued a license as an escort bureau runner unless:

If an individual, he or she has attained the age of eighteen years; or

If a partnership or limited partnership, all partners have attained the age of eighteen years; or

If a corporation, the directors and all officers of the corporation have attained the age of eighteen years; and

If an individual, he or she is a resident of this state for six weeks immediately prior to the filing of the application with the local licensing authority; or

If a partnership or limited partnership, all of the partners thereof are residents of this state for six weeks immediately prior to the filing of the application with the local licensing authority; or

If a corporation, the directors and all of the officers of the corporation are residents of this state for six weeks immediately prior to the filing of the application with the local licensing authority; and

If a corporation, the corporation is qualified with the secretary of state to do business in this state or is incorporated under the laws of this state.

Before granting or denying any license renewal or new license for which an application has been made, the local licensing authority or one or more of its agents or inspectors may visit and inspect the premises or property in or from which the applicant proposes to conduct his or her business and investigate the fitness to conduct the business of any person, including all officers and directors of any corporation, applying for a license. In investigating the fitness of any applicant, licensee, or employee or agent of the licensee or applicant, the local licensing authority may have access to criminal history record information furnished by criminal justice agencies subject to any restrictions imposed by such agencies. In the event the local licensing authority takes into consideration information concerning the applicant's or licensee's criminal history record, the local licensing authority shall also consider any information provided by the applicant or licensee regarding the criminal history record, including, but not limited to, evidence of mitigating factors, rehabilitation, character references, and educational achievements, especially those items pertaining to the period of time between the applicant's last criminal conviction and the consideration of his or her application for a license or license renewal.

As used in this subsection (3), "criminal justice agency" means any federal, state, or municipal court or any governmental agency or subunit of such agency that performs the administration of criminal justice pursuant to a statute or executive order and that allocates a substantial part of its annual budget to the administration of criminal justice.

Every applicant, licensee, or agent or employee of an applicant or licensee, prior to commencing work for, in, or upon the premises of the escort bureau, shall obtain a photographic identity card from the designated law enforcement agency within the licensing jurisdiction in a form prescribed by the local licensing authority and shall carry the identity card at all times while in or upon the licensed premises or while acting as an escort or escort bureau runner.

No escort bureau or escort bureau runner shall employ the services of any person who has not obtained a valid identity card.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1033, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-25.5-106 as it existed prior to 2017.

29-11.8-107. Refusal of license by local licensing authority.

The local licensing authority shall refuse a license if the character of the applicant or any of its officers, directors, or partners is such that violations of this article 11.8 would be likely to result if a license were granted or if the applicant or any of its officers, directors, or partners has held any license issued pursuant to this article 11.8 that was suspended or revoked or for which renewal was denied within two years prior to the date of the application being acted upon. In the event that an otherwise disqualifying refusal, suspension, or revocation is pending judicial review, the local licensing authority shall postpone any action based on the subject matter of the pending review until the review is finally determined.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1035, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-25.5-107 as it existed prior to 2017.

29-11.8-108. Suspension and revocation.

In addition to any other penalties prescribed by this article 11.8, the local licensing authority has the power, on its own motion or on complaint, after investigation and public hearing at which the licensee shall be afforded an opportunity to be heard, to suspend or revoke any license issued by such authority for any violation by the licensee or by any of its agents, servants, or employees of the provisions of this article 11.8, or of any of the rules or regulations authorized pursuant to this article 11.8, or of any of the terms, conditions, or provisions of the license issued by such authority. The local licensing authority has the power to administer oaths and issue subpoenas to require the presence of persons and production of papers, books, and records reasonably necessary to the determination of any hearing which the local licensing authority conducts.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1035, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-25.5-108 as it existed prior to 2017.

29-11.8-109. Persons prohibited as licensees.

No license provided by this article 11.8 shall be issued to or held by:

Any corporation, any of whose officers, directors, or stockholders holding over ten percent of the issued or outstanding capital stock thereof are not of good moral character;

Any partnership, association, or company, any of whose officers, or any of whose members holding more than ten percent interest therein, are not of good moral character;

Any person employing, assisted by, or financed in whole or in part by any other person who is not of good moral character;

A peace officer or any of the local licensing authority's inspectors or employees;

Any person unless the person is of good moral character.

For purposes of determining good moral character, the local licensing authority may consider the criminal record of all applicants, including, but not limited to, any conviction or guilty plea to a charge based on acts of dishonesty, fraud, deceit, sexual misconduct, or prostitution-related misconduct of any kind, whether or not the acts were committed in this state.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1035, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-25.5-109 as it existed prior to 2017.

29-11.8-110. License fees.

The following license fees shall be paid to the local licensing authority annually in advance:

For the issuance of a new escort bureau license, an amount to be set by the local licensing authority, but in no event to exceed five thousand dollars;

For each renewal of an escort bureau license, an amount to be set by the local licensing authority, but in no event to exceed five thousand dollars;

For the issuance of a new escort or escort bureau runner license, an amount to be set by the local licensing authority, but in no event to exceed five hundred dollars;

For each renewal of an escort or escort bureau runner license, an amount to be set by the local licensing authority, but in no event to exceed two hundred fifty dollars.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1036, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-25.5-110 as it existed prior to 2017.

29-11.8-111. Unlawful acts.

It is unlawful for any person:

To operate an escort bureau without holding a currently valid local license;

To work as an escort or escort bureau runner without a currently valid local license;

To work as an escort or escort bureau runner without obtaining and carrying a valid identity card pursuant to section 29-11.8-106 (4);

To allow the provision or procurement of any escort service to or for any person under the age of eighteen years without the written consent of such person's parent or legal guardian;

To permit any person under the age of eighteen years to be employed as an employee in an escort bureau. If any person who, in fact, is not eighteen years of age exhibits a fraudulent proof of age, reasonable reliance on the fraudulent proof of age may constitute an affirmative defense to any action seeking the revocation or suspension of any license issued under this article 11.8 or to any criminal action arising because a person is not at least eighteen years of age.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1036, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-25.5-111 as it existed prior to 2017.

29-11.8-112. Duties of escort bureau.

Every escort bureau shall refer all prospective escorts or escort bureau runners to the local licensing authority for licensing. Upon termination of employment of any escort or escort bureau runner with an escort bureau, the escort bureau shall notify the local licensing authority of such termination within five days.

The escort bureau shall provide to each escort patron a written contract for services. The contract shall clearly state the name and address of the escort and customer, the type of services to be performed, the length of time such services shall be performed, the total amount of money such services will cost the escort patron, and any special terms or conditions relating to the services to be performed. The contract shall include a statement in clear and concise language that prostitution is illegal in this state and that both parties to an act of prostitution may be punished by both fine and imprisonment and that no act of prostitution shall be performed in relation to the services for which contracted. Each contract shall be numbered and utilized in numerical sequence by the escort bureau. The contract shall be signed by the escort patron and a copy furnished to him or her. The escort bureau shall also retain copies of all such contracts, and one copy of each such contract executed in any calendar month shall be transmitted by the escort bureau to the local licensing authority no later than ten days after the last day of such month. The local licensing authority shall treat such contracts transmitted to them as open public records.

Each escort bureau shall provide to each employee of the escort bureau a written notice that includes:

A statement that human trafficking is prohibited in this state by the provisions of sections 18-3-503 and 18-3-504; and

The name, telephone number, and internet website address of a local, statewide, or national organization that provides assistance to victims of human trafficking and slavery.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1037, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-25.5-112 as it existed prior to 2017.

29-11.8-113. Violations - penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this article 11.8 commits a class 2 misdemeanor. In addition to any other penalties, the court trying such offense may decree that any license theretofore issued under the provisions of this article 11.8 be suspended or revoked and may decree that no such license shall thereafter be issued to any such person for a period not to exceed five years.

The penalties provided in this section shall not be affected by the penalties provided in any other section of this article 11.8 but shall be construed to be an addition to any other penalties.

Any adult who causes a violation of the provisions of section 29-11.8-111 (1)(d) or (1)(e) may be proceeded against pursuant to section 18-6-701, for contributing to the delinquency of a minor.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1037, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3246, § 495, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-25.5-113 as it existed prior to 2017.

29-11.8-114. Powers - peace officers - local licensing authority.

The peace officers of the city, town, county, or city and county or the duly authorized representatives of the local licensing authority authorized to enforce the provisions of this article 11.8, while engaged in performing their duties and while acting under proper orders or regulations, shall have and exercise all the powers vested in peace officers of the state, including the power to arrest and the authority to issue summonses for violations of the provisions of this article 11.8.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1038, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-25.5-114 as it existed prior to 2017.

29-11.8-115. Local government regulation.

This article 11.8 is intended to provide minimum standards for the licensing of escort bureaus, escorts, and escort bureau runners. Nothing in this article 11.8 shall prohibit a local government from enacting an ordinance providing more stringent standards for such licensing, but such ordinance shall meet the minimum standards established by this article 11.8. To the extent that this article 11.8 directs implementation by local governments, all such implementing actions may be accomplished by resolution or by ordinance; and such implementing action shall be required upon a request to the local governing body for an application for a license to operate within the jurisdiction of the local governing body. Such a request shall not be acted upon until the implementing action by resolution or ordinance has been accomplished.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1038, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-25.5-115 as it existed prior to 2017.